New Jersey, session 222, A4758.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The Department of Agriculture shall conspicuously post, on the homepage of its Internet website, and update as appropriate: a.  a text link or icon that includes the phrase Suicide Prevention Hotline and the phone number to the New Jersey Suicide Prevention Hopeline, written in capital and bold letters that are of a contrasting type, font, or color, to the surrounding text or background color of the homepage, that hyperlinks to the Internet webpage of the New Jersey Suicide Prevention Hopeline; and b.  an icon, in a color and font that contrasts with, and is easily distinguishable from, the background color of the homepage, that hyperlinks to an Internet webpage on which a list of all resources available to aid distressed farmers, including, but not limited to, suicide prevention hotlines, mental health resources, disaster assistance, legal assistance, and financial assistance, is posted. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.